transducer/chv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Имя существительное
%<pl%>               ! Множественное число
%{A%}                ! vowel harmony
%{н%}                ! Genitive case
%{м%}
%>                   ! Граница морфемы

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON Nouns

урам%<n%>:урам N ;   ! "улица"
пахча%<n%>:пахча N ;  ! "сад, garden "
хула%<n%>:хула N ;  ! "город, city"
канаш%<n%>:канаш N ;  ! "совет, council"

LEXICON CASES

%<ins%>:%>п%{A%} # ;


LEXICON PLURAL

             CASES ;
%<pl%>:%>се%{м%} CASES ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: PLURAL ;
